Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201381-3119
Health and
Human Services Cash Fund; created; transfer; investment.

The Health and Human Services Cash Fund is created and shall consist
of funds from contracts, grants, gifts, or fees. Transfers may be made from
the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall transfer one
million five hundred thousand dollars on or before July 15, 2013, from the
Health and Human Services Cash Fund to the Rural Health Professional Incentive
Fund. Any money in the Health and Human Services Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB961, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 39;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 85;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 38.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.